Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.545

Examinations and investigations—Reports—Access to records—Oaths—Subpoenas.

(1) The director shall make an examination and investigation into the affairs of each credit union at least once every eighteen months, unless the director determines with respect to a credit union, that a less frequent examination schedule will satisfactorily protect the financial stability of the credit union and will satisfactorily assure compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

(2) In regard to credit unions, and out-of-state and foreign credit unions permitted to operate a branch in Washington pursuant to RCW 31.12.471, the director:

(a) Shall have full access to the credit union's books and records and files, including but not limited to computer files;

(b) May appraise and revalue the credit union's investments; and

(c) May require the credit union to charge off or set up a special reserve for loans and investments.

(3) The director may make an examination and investigation into the affairs of:

(a) An out-of-state or foreign credit union permitted to operate a branch in Washington pursuant to RCW 31.12.471;

(b) A nonpublicly held organization, or its subsidiary, in which a credit union has a material investment;

(c) A publicly held organization the capital stock or equity of which is controlled by a credit union;

(d) A credit union service organization, or any tier subsidiary of a credit union service organization, in which a credit union has an interest;

(e) An organization that is not a credit union, out-of-state credit union, federal credit union, or foreign credit union, and that has a majority interest in a credit union service organization in which a credit union has an interest;

(f) A sole proprietorship or organization primarily in the business of managing one or more credit unions;

(g) A person providing electronic data processing services to a credit union or to a credit union service organization; or

(h) A corporation or other business entity that provides alternative share insurance in accordance with RCW 31.12.408.

The director shall have full access to the books, records, personnel, and files, including but not limited to computer files, of persons described in this subsection.

(4) In connection with examinations and investigations, the director may:

(a) Administer oaths and examine under oath any person concerning the affairs of any credit union or of any person described in subsection (3) of this section; and

(b) Issue subpoenas to and require the attendance and testimony of any person at any place within this state, and require witnesses to produce any books and records and files, including but not limited to computer files, that are material to an examination or investigation.

(5) The director may accept in lieu of an examination under this section:

(a) The report of an examiner authorized to examine a credit union or an out-of-state, federal, or foreign credit union, or other financial institution; or

(b) The report of an accountant, satisfactory to the director, who has made and submitted a report of the condition of the affairs of a credit union or an out-of-state, federal, or foreign credit union, or other financial institution. The director may accept all or part of such a report in lieu of all or part of an examination. The accepted report or accepted part of the report has the same force and effect as an examination under this section.

[ 2015 c 114 s 16; 2010 c 87 s 5; 2001 c 83 s 27; 1997 c 397 s 46; 1994 c 92 s 207; 1984 c 31 s 56.]